Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.095

Authority of court commissioners and family law commissioners to hear cases under this chapter.

In any judicial district having a court commissioner, the court commissioner shall have the power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with a juvenile court judge, to hear all cases under RCW 28A.225.030, 28A.225.090, and 28A.225.035 and to enter judgment and make orders with the same power, force, and effect as any judge of the juvenile court, subject to motion or demand by any party within ten days from the entry of the order or judgment by the court commissioner as provided in RCW 2.24.050. In any judicial district having a family law commissioner appointed pursuant to chapter 26.12 RCW, the family law commissioner shall have the power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with a juvenile court judge, to hear cases under RCW 28A.225.030, 28A.225.090, and 28A.225.035 and to enter judgment and make orders with the same power, force, and effect as any judge of the juvenile court, subject to motion or demand by any party within ten days from the entry of the order or judgment by the court commissioner as provided in RCW 2.24.050.

[ 1995 c 312 s 71.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1995 c 312 ss 71 and 82: "(1) Section 71 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1995.

(2) Section 82 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1996." [ 1995 c 312 s 85.]

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.